Utah statutes.
17B-1-619.   Expenditures or encumbrances in excess of appropriations prohibited -- Processing claims.

(1)  A local district may not make or incur expenditures or encumbrances in excess of total appropriations in the budget as adopted or as subsequently amended. 

(2)  An obligation contracted by any officer in excess of total appropriations in the budget is not enforceable against the district.

(3)  No check or warrant to cover a claim against an appropriation may be drawn until the claim has been processed as provided by this part.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 329, 2007 General Session

